Hawaii, session 2026, SB1031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§11-    Advisory referendums.  (a) The legislature may adopt any concurrent resolution to propose a non-binding advisory referendum question to the people, who may vote on the question during any general election; provided that the subject of the non-binding advisory referendum question shall be limited to the issuance of general obligation bonds.  No concurrent resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall embrace more than one referendum question. (b) The chief election officer shall publish a notice of each advisory referendum question in a newspaper of general circulation in the State no later than thirty days before the date of the advisory referendum.  The notice of the advisory referendum shall also be available at all public libraries in the State and the office of the clerk of each county. (c) Each advisory referendum question shall be printed on the ballot and the question shall have a designated space to mark "yes" or "no". (d) Except as provided in subsection (e), advisory referendum questions that appear on a ballot shall be collectively placed under a single heading that includes a statement that reads as follows: "This section of the ballot enables voters to make recommendations advising the legislature whether or not to take action on the questions posed. Regardless of the outcome of the votes on these questions, further action by the legislature is necessary for any recommendation to become law." (e) The chief election officer may make grammatical changes to the statement required by subsection (d) if a single advisory referendum question appears on any ballot. (f) The chief election officer shall certify and report to the public the general election results regarding any advisory referendum question at or about the same time of the release of other results for the same general election.  The chief election officer shall also report to the legislature the general election results regarding any advisory referendum question no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session that immediately follows the general election. (g) The legislature shall consider the reported general election results of any relevant advisory referendum question when authorizing the issuance of general obligation bonds.  The legislature may act in contradiction to the results of the advisory referendum question; provided that a written explanation of the legislative act that is contrary to the reported majority vote on the advisory referendum question is reflected in the legislative record." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2491.